New Mexico, session 2026, HB23.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] NONFUNCTIONAL TURF--PROHIBITIONS ON INSTALLATION AND WATER FOR IRRIGATION--EXCEPTIONS.-- A. Beginning January 1, 2028, nonfunctional turf shall not be installed on property managed by the general services department or the legislative council service. B. Except as provided in Subsection C of this section, beginning January 1, 2033: (1) only recycled or reclaimed water shall be used to irrigate nonfunctional turf on property managed by the general services department or the legislative council service; and (2) nonfunctional turf on property managed by the general services department or the legislative council service that is removed shall be replaced with drought- or climate-resilient landscaping. C. The following are exempt from the requirements of this section: (1) cemeteries; and (2) nonfunctional turf under a tree's canopy if the general services department or the legislative council service makes the determination that replacing the nonfunctional turf with mulch would not be feasible or practical. D. The general services department shall establish the programs and procedures necessary to implement the provisions of this section, including a procedure for that department to reimburse the legislative council service for costs the legislative council service incurs in complying with the provisions of this section. E. As used in this section: (1) "drought- or climate-resilient landscaping" includes efficient irrigation systems, such as drip, water harvesting and reuse systems and organic mulches, that maintain a landscape of xeriscaping, trees and other plants that, once established, require little to no supplemental water, such as native and drought-tolerant plants; and (2) "nonfunctional turf" means irrigated turf grass that has no recreational purpose, is not accessible or is primarily decorative. SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION.--Three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the general services department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years to carry out the purposes of Section 1 of this act. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. - 3 -